Tennessee, session 114, HB0904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-1-213, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary, a judge, hearing
officer, or administrative judge may award a person or entity that prevails in an
administrative or civil action brought against the person or entity by the commission, or
challenging the actions of the commission, attorneys' fees and costs incurred as a result
of the administrative or civil action.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0904
002788
- 1 -